ro-RO: Componente incluse în grupul de transmisie: Monobloc; Etriere de frână; Cabluri/Cămăși; Casetă; Lanț; Angrenaj; Schimbător de foi; Schimbător de pinioane; Manete schimbătoare; Altele
sk-SK: Vrátane súčastí skupinovej sady: Stredové zloženie; Brzdové strmene; Lanká/bovdeny; Kazeta; Reťaz; Kľuky; Prešmykač; Prehadzovačka; Radiace páčky; Iné
es: Componentes del grupo incluidos: Eje de pedalier; Pinzas de freno; Cables/fundas; Cassette; Cadena; Juego de bielas; Desviador delantero; Desviador trasero; Manetas de cambio; Otro
pt-PT: Componentes do conjunto incluídos: Eixo pedaleiro; Pinças de travão; Cabos/bichas; Cassete; Corrente; Pedaleira; Desviador dianteiro; Desviador traseiro; Manípulos de mudanças; Outros
nb: Inkluderte gir- og bremsekomponenter: Kranklager; Bremsekalipere; Kabler/strømper; Kassett; Kjede; Kranksett; Forgir; Bakgir; Girspaker; Annet
nl: Inbegrepen groepsetonderdelen: Trapas; Remklauwen; Kabels/behuizing; Cassette; Ketting; Crankstel; Voorderailleur; Achterderailleur; Shifters; Overig
hu: Hajtáslánc szett tartozékai: Középcsapágy; Féknyergek; Kábelek/bowdenházak; Fogaskoszorú; Lánc; Hajtómű; Első váltó; Hátsó váltó; Váltókarok; Egyéb
bg-BG: Включени компоненти на групсета: Средно движение; Спирачни апарати; Жила/брони; Касета; Верига; Курбел; Преден дерайльор; Заден дерайльор; Команди; Други
lt-LT: Į važiuoklės dalių grupių komplektą įeinantys komponentai: Miniklio velenas; Stabdžių apkabos; Trosai / šarvai; Kasetė; Grandinė; Švaistiklių sistema; Priekinis pavarų perjungiklis; Galinis pavarų perjungiklis; Pavarų perjungimo rankenėlės; Kita
fr: Groupset components included: Boîtier de pédalier; Étriers de frein; Câbles/gaines; Cassette; Chaîne; Pédalier; Dérailleur avant; Dérailleur arrière; Manettes de changement de vitesse; Autre
ko: 그룹 세트 구성품 포함: 바텀 브래킷; 브레이크 캘리퍼; 케이블/하우징; 카세트; 체인; 크랭크셋; 앞 변속기; 뒷 변속기; 시프터; 기타
th: ส่วนประกอบชุดเกียร์ที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: กะโหลกจักรยาน; ก้ามปูเบรก; สาย/ปลอกสาย; เฟืองท้าย; โซ่; ชุดจานหน้า; สับจานหน้า; ตีนผี; ชิฟเตอร์; อื่นๆ
en: Groupset components included: Bottom bracket; Brake calipers; Cables/housing; Cassette; Chain; Crankset; Front derailleur; Rear derailleur; Shifters; Other
da: Gruppesætkomponenter medfølger: Krankboks; Bremsekalibre; Kabler/kappe; Kassette; Kæde; Kranksæt; Forskifter; Bagskifter; Skiftegreb; Andet
de: Groupset-Komponenten inklusive: Tretlager; Bremssättel; Kabel/Hüllen; Kassette; Kette; Kurbelgarnitur; Umwerfer; Schaltwerk; Schalthebel; Sonstige
pl: Elementy grupy osprzętu w zestawie: Suport; Zaciski hamulcowe; Linki / Pancerze; Kaseta; Łańcuch; Mechanizm korbowy; Przerzutka przednia; Przerzutka tylna; Manetki; Inne
pt-BR: Componentes do conjunto incluídos: Movimento central; Pinças de freio; Cabos/conduítes; Cassete; Corrente; Pedivela; Câmbio dianteiro; Câmbio traseiro; Trocadores de marcha; Outros
zh-TW: 包含套件組件: 五通碗組; 煞車卡鉗; 線管/外殼; 飛輪; 鏈條; 大盤; 前變速器; 後變速器; 變速把手; 其他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα groupset: Μεσαία τριβή; Δαγκάνες φρένων; Καλώδια/περιβλήματα; Κασέτα; Αλυσίδα; Δισκοβραχίονας; Εμπρόσθιος εκτροχιαστής; Οπίσθιος εκτροχιαστής; Λεβιέδες ταχυτήτων; Άλλο
it: Componenti del groupset inclusi: Movimento centrale; Pinze dei freni; Cavi/guaine; Cassetta; Catena; Guarnitura; Deragliatore anteriore; Deragliatore posteriore; Comandi cambio; Altro
hr-HR: Uključene komponente groupseta: Osovina pogona; Čeljusti kočnice; Sajle/bužiri; Kazeta; Lanac; Pogon; Prednji mjenjač; Stražnji mjenjač; Ručice mjenjača; Ostalo
fi: Mukana tulevat osasarjan osat: Keskiö; Jarrusatulat; Vaijerit/kuoret; Takapakka; Ketju; Kampisarja; Etuvaihtaja; Takavaihtaja; Vaihtajat; Muu
sv: Medföljande delar i gruppset: Vevlager; Bromsok; Vajrar/höljen; Kassett; Kedja; Vevparti; Framväxel; Bakväxel; Växelreglage; Övrigt
ru: Состав групсета: Каретка; Тормозные калиперы; Тросы/рубашки; Кассета; Цепь; Шатуны; Передний переключатель; Задний переключатель; Шифтеры; Другое
zh-CN: 包括套件组件: 中轴; 刹车夹器; 线缆/线管; 飞轮; 链条; 牙盘; 前拨链器; 后拨链器; 变速拨杆; 其他
tr: Dahil olan grup seti bileşenleri: Orta göbek; Fren kaliperleri; Kablolar/muhafaza; Kaset; Zincir; Aynakol; Ön vites; Arka vites; Vites kolları; Diğer
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm trong bộ truyền động xe đạp: Trục giữa; Ngàm phanh; Cáp/vỏ cáp; Líp; Xích; Bộ đùi đĩa; Đề trước; Đề sau; Tay đề; Khác
cs: Přiložené součásti sady: Středové složení; Brzdové třmeny; Lanka/bovdeny; Kazeta; Řetěz; Kliky s převodníky; Přesmykač; Přehazovačka; Řadicí páčky; Ostatní
ja: グループセットコンポーネント付き: ボトムブラケット; ブレーキキャリパー; ケーブル/ハウジング; カセット; チェーン; クランクセット; フロントディレイラー; リアディレイラー; シフター; その他
sl-SI: Vključeni sestavni deli pogonskega sklopa: Gonilni ležaj; Zavorne čeljusti; Pletenice in bovdeni; Kaseta; Veriga; Gonilka; Sprednji menjalnik; Zadnji menjalnik; Prestavne ročice; Drugo